Hawaii statutes.
§1-18 "Or", "and".
Each of the terms "or" and "and", has the meaning of the
other or of both. [PC 1869, c 1, §4; RL 1925, §15; RL 1935, §16; RL 1945, §15;
am L 1945, c 233, §2; RL 1955, §1-23; HRS §1-18]

Case Notes

Applied: 230 F. Supp. 455; 17 H. 135, 141; 34 H. 935, 941.

"And" deemed conjunctive, not alternative. 33 H.
98, 101.

"Or" deemed alternative, not conjunctive, penal
statute. 44 H. 601, 604, 359 P.2d 289.

Applied in substituting "and" for "or" in
public accountancy statute. 51 H. 80, 452 P.2d 94.

"Or" deemed "and". 54 H. 356, 507 P.2d
169.

Use of word "and" is not necessarily decisive. 56
H. 675, 548 P.2d 268.

Cited: 52 F.2d 411, 414; 5 H. 52, 53; 19 H. 393, 397.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next